Utah statutes.
32B-6-504.   Specific licensing requirements for airport lounge license.

(1)  To obtain an airport lounge license, in addition to complying with Chapter 5, Part 2, Retail Licensing Process, a person shall submit with the written application:

(a)  both the written consent of the local authority and the written consent of the airport authority; and

(b)  a copy of the sign proposed to be used by the airport lounge licensee on its licensed premises to inform the public that alcoholic products are sold and consumed on the licensed premises.

(2) (a)  An airport lounge license expires on October 31 of each year.

(b)  To renew a person's airport lounge license, a person shall comply with the renewal requirements of Chapter 5, Part 2, Retail Licensing Process, by no later than September 30.

(3) (a)  The nonrefundable application fee for an airport lounge license is $300.

(b)  The initial license fee for an airport lounge license is $8,000.

(c)  The renewal fee for an airport lounge license is $6,000.

(4)  The bond amount required for an airport lounge license is the penal sum of $10,000.

(5)  An airport lounge license is not subject to the proximity requirements of Section 32B-1-202.

